Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
Veterans’ Nursing Homes

40.320.
Purpose of KRS 36.355.

The General Assembly has determined the establishment of state veterans’ nursing homes to be in the best interests of the veterans of the Commonwealth and necessary to the well-being of our elderly and disabled veterans. Therefore, it is the purpose of KRS

40.325

to authorize the establishment of state veterans’ nursing homes, to promote their construction or renovation, and to assign administrative responsibility for their planning and operation.

History.

Repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 2000, ch. 147, § 5, effective July 14, 2000.

40.325.
Definition of “nurse aide” — Veterans’ nursing homes — Office of Kentucky Veterans’ Centers — Administrative regulations — Funding — Contracts to hire licensed nurses and nurse aides to provide long-term care.

As used in this section, “nurse aide” means an individual who has successfully completed the nurse aide training and competency evaluation program and may include a nursing student, medication aide, or a person employed through a nursing pool who provides nursing or nursing-related services to a resident in a nursing facility, excluding:

An individual who is a licensed health professional;

A volunteer who provides the nursing or nursing-related services without monetary compensation; or

A person who is hired by the resident or family to sit with the resident and who does not perform nursing or nursing-related services.

There shall be established and maintained in the Commonwealth of Kentucky state veterans’ nursing homes to provide long-term care to veterans who are residents of Kentucky.

There is created the Office of Kentucky Veterans’ Centers within the Office of the Commissioner of the Department of Veterans’ Affairs. The office shall be headed by an executive director appointed pursuant to KRS

12.050

. The office shall operate the Kentucky state veterans’ centers and medical division. The Department of Veterans’ Affairs may promulgate any administrative regulations necessary to operate the homes in compliance with applicable state and federal statutes and regulations.

The Department of Veterans’ Affairs may seek federal and private funding for the construction or renovation, and operation of Kentucky state veterans’ nursing homes.

The executive director of the Office of Kentucky Veterans’ Centers, with the approval of the commissioner of the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, may contract to hire licensed nurses and nurse aides in order to provide needed long-term care of veterans in residence at state veterans’ nursing homes, and those contracts shall not be subject to KRS

45A.550

to

45A.554

or

45A.690

to

45A.725

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 31, § 2, effective February 28, 1986; 1994, ch. 474, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 244, § 7, effective July 15, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2000, ch. 147, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 83, §§ 1, 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2017 ch. 39, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 118, § 2, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 95, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

40.327.
Loan repayment program for registered nurses and licensed practical nurses employed by Department of Veterans’ Affairs — KHEAA to administer program — Funding.

The Kentucky Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall create a loan repayment program for registered nurses and licensed practical nurses within their employ.

The loan repayment program shall apply to any existing student loan incurred by the employee as a result of that employee’s academic or technical studies leading to becoming a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse.

The loan repayment program shall not apply to loans previously repaid.

Recipients of the loan repayment program shall sign a contract stipulating:

The recipient’s existing student loan debt shall be repaid up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the loan’s principal and interest up to a maximum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) after satisfactory completion of one (1) year of employment at the state veterans’ nursing home assigned;

The recipient’s student loan shall be repaid up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the loan’s principal and interest up to a maximum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) after satisfactory completion of a second consecutive full year of employment at the state veterans’ nursing home assigned;

The recipient’s student loan shall be repaid up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the loan’s principal and interest up to a maximum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) after satisfactory completion of a third consecutive full year of employment at the state veterans’ nursing home assigned;

The recipient’s student loan shall be repaid up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the loan’s principal and interest up to a maximum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) after satisfactory completion of a fourth consecutive full year of employment at the state veterans’ nursing home assigned; and

The total amount paid by the loan repayment program shall not exceed forty thousand dollars ($40,000) for a maximum of four (4) consecutive full years of employment per person.

The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority shall administer this program from funds provided by the Kentucky Department of Veterans’ Affairs as funds are available.

The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority and the Kentucky Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall promulgate administrative regulations necessary for the effectuation of this section, including limits on the amount of any loan that will be repaid.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 117, § 1, effective January 1, 2020.

40.330.
Authorization to apply for issuance of revenue bonds — Other financial arrangements.

For the purpose of financing the costs of the construction or renovation of Kentucky state veterans’ nursing homes and all proper costs necessary or incidental thereto, the Department of Veterans’ Affairs is hereby authorized to apply to the State Property and Buildings Commission for the issuance of revenue bonds and to enter into any leases or other financing agreements in respect of the Kentucky state veterans’ nursing homes necessary or desirable to provide revenues to amortize and secure the revenue bonds.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 437, Pt. X, § 1, effective April 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 474, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 244, § 8, effective July 15, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2000, ch. 147, § 7, effective July 14, 2000.

40.335.
Revenue bonds — Provisions — Exempt from taxation — Negotiability — Conditions in authorizing resolution — Sale of bonds — Prior consent not required.

Revenue bonds issued under the provisions of KRS

40.330

and this section shall state that they are issued pursuant to KRS

40.330

and this section and to the provisions of KRS Chapters 56 and 58, as applicable. Revenue bonds issued under the provisions of KRS 40.330 and this section and the interest thereon shall be exempt from all taxation by the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions. Revenue bonds issued under the provisions of KRS 40.330 and this section shall have and are hereby declared to have all the incidents of negotiable instruments.

The State Property and Buildings Commission, in each resolution authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds under the provisions of KRS

40.330

and this section, shall determine the following:

The maturity date or dates of the revenue bonds;

The manner in which interest shall be paid thereon;

The terms of redemption applicable thereto; and

Such other particulars of the revenue bonds not contrary to law or inconsistent with KRS

40.330

and this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS Chapters 56 and 58, revenue bonds issued under the provisions of KRS

40.330

and this section may be sold by the State Property and Buildings Commission, and the interest rates to be borne by such bonds shall be determined, in such manner as the State Property and Buildings Commission shall decide, including, without limitation, sale by private negotiation.

No consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the Commonwealth other than the proceedings, conditions and other things which are specifically required by KRS

40.330

and this section and KRS Chapters 56 and 58, shall be required for the issuance of revenue bonds under the provisions of KRS

40.330

and this section.

History.

Repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 2000, ch. 147, § 8, effective July 14, 2000.